Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201452-1205
Lien satisfied; financing statement; termination.

When
a lien created under section 52-1201 is satisfied, any
financing statement filed to perfect that lien shall be terminated in the
manner and form provided in article 9, Uniform Commercial Code.

Laws 1988, LB 943, § 12;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 31;

Laws 2001, LB 54, § 22;

Laws 2014, LB750, § 13.